Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “State-Sponsored
Persecution Prohibition Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No state agency shall for personal, political, or
ideological reasons:
1. Maliciously investigate a law-abiding private business,
farmer, rancher, or taxpayer with the intent to intimidate or
harass;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1015 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Threaten or attempt to threaten any law-abiding private
business, farmer, rancher, or taxpayer with punitive regulation or
retaliation for questioning the agency or reporting misconduct of
the agency; or
3. Excessively and repetitively harass through communication a
law-abiding private business, farmer, rancher, or taxpayer.
B. Any agency found to have knowingly and willingly violated
this section of law shall be subject to civil action by the person
or persons directly impacted by the willful violation of the agency
and shall be entitled to seek damages and attorney fees.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1015 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)